Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1807.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 441.10. Work Requirements for Medicaid Enrollees.--No later than March 1, 2026, and by March 1 of each year thereafter, the secretary shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services for a waiver under 42 U.S.C. § 1315 (relating to demonstration projects) for the following purposes:(1) Instituting a work requirement for a Medicaid enrollee who is eighteen years of age or older and physically and mentally capable of work. The work requirement shall require a Medicaid enrollee to become employed, actively seek employment 12345678910111213141516171819 as verified by the department or attend a job training program in accordance with the following:(i) In the case of a Medicaid enrollee who is employed or attending job training programs in order to maintain enrollment in the Medicaid program, the Medicaid enrollee shall work twenty hours a week or complete twelve job training program-related activities a month.(ii) A Medicaid enrollee who complies with the work requirement under subparagraph (i) may have Medicaid premiums or cost-sharing reduced or other incentives beginning in year two of employment.(iii) A Medicaid enrollee who has failed to comply with the work requirement under subparagraph (i) shall relinquish Medicaid program eligibility for the following time periods:(A) Three months beginning in year two of employment.(B) Six months beginning after the time period under clause (A) expires.(C) Nine months beginning after the time period under clause (B) expires.(2) Requiring an able-bodied Medicaid enrollee who is eighteen years of age or older to verify on a biannual basis or by request of the department the Medicaid enrollee's family income or the Medicaid enrollee's compliance with the provisions under paragraph (1) for the purpose of determining the Medicaid enrollee's eligibility.(3) Banning an individual from enrolling in a Medicaid program if the individual has failed to comply with paragraphs (1) and (2).(4) Exempting a Medicaid enrollee from the requirements under paragraphs (1) and (2) under any of the following 20250HB1807PN2222 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions:(i) The Medicaid enrollee is attending high school as a full-time student.(ii) The Medicaid enrollee is currently receiving temporary or permanent long-term disability benefits.(iii) The Medicaid enrollee is an individual twenty years of age or younger or sixty-five years of age or older.(iv) The Medicaid enrollee is a pregnant woman.(v) The Medicaid enrollee receives Supplemental Security Income benefits.(vi) The Medicaid enrollee resides in a mental health institution or correctional institution.(vii) The Medicaid enrollee is experiencing a crisis, serious medical condition or temporary condition that prevents the Medicaid enrollee from actively seeking employment, including domestic violence or substance use treatment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1807PN2222 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617